Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201267-296
Act, how cited.

Sections 67-233 to 67,2,100 shall be known and
may be cited as the Nebraska Uniform Limited Partnership Act.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 64;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 63;

Laws 2012, LB1018, § 14.
July 19, 2012